Washington statutes.
RCW 7.56.010

Against whom information may be filed.

An information may be filed against any person or corporation in the following cases:

(1) When any person shall usurp, intrude upon, or unlawfully hold or exercise any public office or franchise within the state, or any office in any corporation created by the authority of the state.

(2) When any public officer shall have done or suffered any act, which, by the provisions of law, shall work a forfeiture of his or her office.

(3) When several persons claim to be entitled to the same office or franchise, one information may be filed against any or all such persons in order to try their respective rights to the office or franchise.

(4) When any association or number of persons shall act within this state as a corporation, without being legally incorporated.

(5) Or where any corporation do, or omit acts which amount to a surrender or a forfeiture of their rights and privileges as a corporation, or where they exercise powers not conferred by law.

[ 2011 c 336 s 236; Code 1881 s 702; 1877 p 143 s 706; 1854 p 216 s 468; RRS s 1034.]